District of Columbia statutes.
9-805

Lease of space or property.

The Administrator is empowered to lease under such conditions as he may deem proper and for such periods as may be desirable space or property within or upon the airport for purposes essential or appropriate to the operation of the airport; provided, that no lease for the use of any hangar or space therein shall extend for a period exceeding 3 years.

History

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 771, ch. 905, § 5
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-806.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1205.
1973 Ed., § 7-1405.